District of Columbia statutes.
38-1110

Grants to Federal City College and Washington Technical Institute.

Grants to the District of Columbia under the acts referred to in § 38-1107 and under § 38-1109(b) and the earnings of sums appropriated under § 38-1108 shall be shared equally between the Federal City College and the Washington Technical Institute.

History

Nov. 7, 1966, Pub. L. 89-791, title I, § 110
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1935, Pub. L. 91-650, title IV, § 401(c)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-1111.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1410.
1973 Ed., § 31-1610.